Maryland, session 2026, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–108.
(a) A unit of State government may not knowingly use public funds to influence
the decisions of State employees to:
(1) support or oppose an employee organization that represents or seeks to
represent the employees of the unit of State government; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1173*

HOUSE BILL 1173
(2) become a member of an employee organization.
(B) A CONTRACTOR OR VENDOR CONTRACTED BY A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT MAY NOT KNOWINGLY USE PUBLIC FUNDS TO INFLUENCE THE
DECISIONS OF EMPLOYEES OF THE CONTRACTOR, EMPLOYEES OF THE VENDOR, OR
EMPLOYEES OF ANY SUBCONTRACTOR PERFORMING WORK UNDER A STATE
CONTRACT TO:
(1) SUPPORT OR OPPOSE AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION THAT
REPRESENTS OR SEEKS TO REPRESENT THE EMPLOYEES OF THE CONTRACTOR,
VENDOR, OR SUBCONTRACTOR; OR
(2) BECOME A MEMBER OF AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION.
(C) A CONTRACTOR OR VENDOR CONTRACTED BY A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT MAY NOT KNOWINGLY USE PUBLIC FUNDS OR RESOURCES TO
CONTRACT WITH OR PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ANY PERSON FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(1) CARRYING OUT A CAMPAIGN AGAINST EFFORTS BY EMPLOYEES OF
THE CONTRACTOR OR VENDOR TO:
(I) GAIN OR RETAIN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING RIGHTS; OR
(II) CERTIFY AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE; OR
(2) ENGAGING IN ANTI–UNION ACTIVITIES.
[(b)] (D) This section does not apply to an activity performed or to an expense
incurred in connection with:
(1) addressing a grievance or negotiating or administering a collective
bargaining agreement;
(2) allowing an employee organization or a representative of an employee
organization access to and use of State facilities or properties;
(3) performing an activity required by federal or State law or a collective
bargaining agreement;
(4) negotiating, entering into, or carrying out a voluntary recognition
agreement with an employee organization; or
(5) paying wages to a represented employee while the employee is
performing duties if the payment is permitted under a collective bargaining agreement.

HOUSE BILL 1173 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.